Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 5. Migratory Fish and Shellfish.

Sec. 16.10.180.
Legislative findings.

The legislature finds and recognizes these facts:

migratory fish and migratory shellfish are present in commercial quantities inside and outside the territorial waters of the state;

migratory fish and migratory shellfish taken from the waters of the state are indistinguishable, in most cases, from those taken from the adjacent high seas;

substantial quantities of migratory fish and migratory shellfish move inshore and offshore intermittently and at various times during a given year and in so doing often enter and leave territorial waters of the state;

to conserve the migratory fish and migratory shellfish found inside the waters of the state it is necessary to strictly enforce local laws and regulations;

by making certain laws and regulations enacted or adopted for the regulation of the coastal fishery applicable to the adjacent high sea areas, enforcement of these laws and regulations is facilitated;

conservation regulations should not be adopted to impose economic sanctions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 121 SLA 1960)

Sec. 16.10.190.
Regulations.

The Board of Fisheries may adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of AS

16.10.180

—

16.10.230

defining the adjacent high sea areas, migratory fish, and migratory shellfish and to make coastal fishery regulations governing the manner, means, conditions, and time for the taking of migratory fish and migratory shellfish applicable in designated adjacent high sea areas.

History.

(§ 2 ch 121 SLA 1960; am § 21 ch 206 SLA 1975)

Administrative Code. —

For Kuskokwim Area (Registration Area W), see 5 AAC 27, art. 13.

For Eastern Gulf of Alaska Area (Registration Area A), see 5 AAC 28, art. 4.

For Prince William Sound Area (Registration Area E), see 5 AAC 28, art. 5.

For registration areas, see 5 AAC 31, art. 1.

For registration areas, see 5 AAC 32, art. 1.

For registration areas, see 5 AAC 34, art. 1.

For registration areas, see 5 AAC 35, art. 1.

For description of area, see 5 AAC 36, art. 1.

For registration areas, see 5 AAC 38, art. 1.

For Southeast Alaska Area, see 5 AAC 47.

For Prince William Sound Area, see 5 AAC 55.

For Cook Inlet — Resurrection Bay Saltwater Area, see 5 AAC 58.

For Kodiak Area, see 5 AAC 64.

For Alaska Peninsula and Aleutian Islands Area, see 5 AAC 65.

For Bristol Bay Area, see 5 AAC 67.

Sec. 16.10.200.
Unlawful taking prohibited.

A person taking migratory fish and migratory shellfish in high sea areas designated by the Board of Fisheries or in violation of the regulations adopted by the Board of Fisheries governing the taking of migratory fish and migratory shellfish in the designated areas may not possess, sell, offer to sell, barter, offer to barter, give, or transport in the state, including the waters of the state, migratory fish or migratory shellfish.

History.

(§ 3 ch 121 SLA 1960; am § 22 ch 206 SLA 1975)

Administrative Code. —

For salmon, see 5 AAC 36, art. 3.

Sec. 16.10.210.
Unlawful sale or offer prohibited.

A person may not possess, purchase, offer to purchase, sell, or offer to sell in the state migratory fish or migratory shellfish taken on the high seas knowing that they were taken in violation of a regulation adopted by the Board of Fisheries governing the taking of migratory fish or migratory shellfish in certain areas designated by the Board of Fisheries or the commissioner.

History.

(§ 4 ch 121 SLA 1960; am § 23 ch 206 SLA 1975)

Sec. 16.10.220.
Penalty for violation of AS 16.10.200 and 16.10.210.

A person who violates AS

16.10.200

and

16.10.210

is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $5,000 or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both.

History.

(§ 5 ch 121 SLA 1960)

Collateral references. —

Entrapment with respect to violation of fish and game laws.
75 ALR2d 709.

Sec. 16.10.230.
Exemptions.

AS

16.10.180

—

16.10.220

do not apply to

the use of nets for fishing for or taking salmon for the purposes of scientific investigation authorized by state law; and

existing laws and regulations prohibiting the taking of salmon by means of nets on the high seas.

History.

(§ 6 ch 121 SLA 1960; am § 29 ch 132 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraphs (1) and (2) were formerly (2) and (3). Renumbered in 2012 due to the 1984 repeal of former paragraph (1).